District of Columbia statutes.
2-535

Recording of final votes.

Each agency having more than 1 member shall maintain and make available for public inspection a record of the final votes of each member in each proceeding of that agency.

History

Oct. 21, 1968, Pub. L. 90-614, title II, § 205
as added Mar. 29, 1977, D.C. Law 1-96, § 2, 23 DCR 9532b

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1525.
1973 Ed., § 1-1525.